Wisconsin, session 2025, AB280.
do enact as follows:AB280,11Section 1. 71.07 (3y) (b) 6. of the statutes is amended to read:AB280,2,11271.07 (3y) (b) 6. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2023, the 3amount of the investment in workforce housing, as defined in s. 234.66 (1) (i), for 4employees, not to exceed 15 percent of such investment, and the amount of the 5investment in establishing an employee a child care program for employees, not to 6exceed 15 percent of such investment, as determined by the Wisconsin Economic 7Development Corporation. For purposes of this subdivision, investments include 8capital expenditures made by the claimant and contributions made by the claimant 9to a 3rd party responsible for building or rehabilitating workforce housing or 10establishing a child care program, including contributions made to a local revolving 11fund loan program.AB280,212Section 2. 71.28 (3y) (b) 6. of the statutes is amended to read:AB280,2,221371.28 (3y) (b) 6. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2023, the 14amount of the investment in workforce housing, as defined in s. 234.66 (1) (i), for 15employees, not to exceed 15 percent of such investment, and the amount of the 16investment made in establishing an employee a child care program for employees, 17not to exceed 15 percent of such investment, as determined by the Wisconsin 18Economic Development Corporation. For purposes of this subdivision, investments 19include capital expenditures made by the claimant and contributions made by the 20claimant to a 3rd party responsible for building or rehabilitating workforce housing 21or establishing a child care program, including contributions made to a local 22revolving fund loan program.AB280,31Section 3. 71.47 (3y) (b) 6. of the statutes is amended to read:AB280,3,11271.47 (3y) (b) 6. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2023, the 3amount of the investment in workforce housing, as defined in s. 234.66 (1) (i), for 4employees, not to exceed 15 percent of such investment, and the amount of the 5investment made in establishing an employee a child care program for employees, 6not to exceed 15 percent of such investment, as determined by the Wisconsin 7Economic Development Corporation. For purposes of this subdivision, investments 8include capital expenditures made by the claimant and contributions made by the 9claimant to a 3rd party responsible for building or rehabilitating workforce housing 10or establishing a child care program, including contributions made to a local 11revolving fund loan program.AB280,412Section 4. 238.308 (4) (a) 6. of the statutes is amended to read:AB280,3,2013238.308 (4) (a) 6. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2023, an 14amount equal to up to 15 percent of the person’s investment in workforce housing, 15as defined in s. 234.66 (1) (i), for employees and up to 15 percent of the person’s 16investment in establishing an employee a child care program for employees. Such 17investments may include only capital expenditures made by the person and 18contributions made by the person to a 3rd party responsible for building or 19rehabilitating workforce housing or establishing a child care program, including 20contributions made to a local revolving loan fund program.AB280,521Section 5. Initial applicability.AB280,3,2222(1) This act first applies to taxable years beginning on January 1, 2025.AB280,3,2323